Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-301
Commission; general authority.

Except as otherwise provided in sections 37-302 to 37-313, 37-315, 37-317, 37-330, 37-425, and 37-608, the commission shall have sole charge of state parks, game and fish, recreation grounds, and all things pertaining thereto. All funds rendered available by law, including funds already collected for such purposes, may be used by the commission in administering and developing such resources.

Laws 1929, c. 113, § 5, p. 444;

C.S.1929, § 81-6505;

Laws 1935, c. 174, § 3, p. 640;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 81-6505;

R.S.1943, § 81-805;

Laws 1949, c. 283, § 1, p. 980;

Laws 1959, c. 431, § 1, p. 1439;

Laws 1959, c. 432, § 21, p. 1455;

Laws 1959, c. 433, § 2, p. 1458;

Laws 1959, c. 434, § 1, p. 1460;

Laws 1961, c. 174, § 5, p. 519;

Laws 1967, c. 585, § 8, p. 1977;

Laws 1967, c. 231, § 4, p. 611;

Laws 1969, c. 799, § 1, p. 3007;

Laws 1971, LB 53, § 12;

Laws 1972, LB 1169, § 1;

Laws 1974, LB 779, § 3;

Laws 1981, LB 72, § 22;

Laws 1993, LB 235, § 46;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 481;

Laws 1994, LB 1066, § 100;

Laws 1996, LB 584, § 19;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 81-805;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 59.